District of Columbia statutes.
2-1223.02

Establishment of the Corporation; purposes

Repealed.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-219, § 102, 51 DCR 9142
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 104(a), 55 DCR 1689

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-586, November 1, 2004, 51 DCR 10681).

Emergency Legislation